Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to FilmNorth to develop statewide plans, programs, and resources to support the growth and development of the Minnesota film industry through career-connected learning, workforce development, and business development with a focus on better supporting people from marginalized or rural communities. new text end